Georgia statutes. TITLE 47 Retirement and Pensions
Article 2 Creation, Administration, and Management of the Assets of the Retirement System

Administrative rules and regulations.

Administrative Rules, Official Compilation of the Rules and Regulations of the State of Georgia, Teachers Retirement System of Georgia, Chapter 513-5-1.

47-3-20.
Creation and management of the Teachers Retirement System of Georgia; its powers and privileges; name under which business transacted.

A retirement system is established for the purpose of providing retirement allowances and other benefits under this chapter for teachers of this state and is placed under the management of the board of trustees. It shall have the power and privileges of a corporation, the right to bring and defend actions, to implead and be impleaded, and shall be known as the “Teachers Retirement System of Georgia,” in which name all of its business shall be transacted, all of its funds invested, and all of its cash and securities and other property held.

History.

Ga. L. 1943, p. 640, § 2; Ga. L. 1982, p. 3, § 47.

47-3-21.
Creation and membership of board of trustees; filling of vacancies; per diem, expenses, and oath of office; quorum; creation, membership, and duties of Teachers Retirement System Nomination Committee.

There is created a board of trustees which shall consist of ten trustees as follows:

The state auditor, ex officio;

One member who shall be an active member of the Teachers Retirement System of Georgia who is a classroom teacher and is not an employee of the Board of Regents of the University System of Georgia. Such member shall be appointed by the Governor for a term of three years with the initial term beginning April 1, 1991. In making the appointment, the Governor may consider, but not be limited to, nominations furnished him by the nominating committee provided for by subsection (g) of this Code section;

The state treasurer, ex officio;

One member who shall be an active member of the Teachers Retirement System of Georgia who is a classroom teacher and not an employee of the Board of Regents of the University System of Georgia. Such member shall be appointed by the Governor for a term of three years with the initial term beginning July 1, 1984. In making the appointment the Governor may consider, but not be limited to, nominations furnished him by the nominating committee provided for by subsection (g) of this Code section;

One member who shall be an active member of the Teachers Retirement System of Georgia who is a school administrator and not an employee of the Board of Regents of the University System of Georgia. Such member shall be appointed by the Governor for a term of three years with the initial term beginning July 1, 1986. In making the appointment the Governor may consider, but not be limited to, nominations furnished him by the nominating committee provided for by subsection (g) of this Code section. The trustee occupying the “school administrator” position on the board of trustees on July 1, 1984, and a prior appointment by the Governor shall continue to serve in this position from July 1, 1984, until July 1, 1986;

One member who shall be an active member of the Teachers Retirement System of Georgia who is not an employee of the Board of Regents of the University System of Georgia. Such member shall be appointed by the Governor for a term of three years with the initial term beginning July 1, 1985. In making the appointment the Governor may consider, but not be limited to, nominations furnished him by the nominating committee provided for by subsection (g) of this Code section. Prior to July 1, 1984, the trustees holding office under immediately preceding law and prior appointments by the Governor shall elect a person to occupy this position on the board of trustees from July 1, 1984, until July 1, 1985;

One member who shall be an active member of the Teachers Retirement System of Georgia who is an employee of the Board of Regents of the University System of Georgia and who shall be appointed by the board of regents for a term of three years with the initial term beginning July 1, 1985. The trustee occupying the “employee of the board of regents” position on the board of trustees on July 1, 1984, and a prior appointment by the board of regents shall continue to serve in this position from July 1, 1984, until July 1, 1985;

One member to be appointed by the Governor for a term of three years with the initial term beginning July 1, 1984;

One member who has retired under the Teachers Retirement System of Georgia and who shall be elected by the remaining trustees for a term of three years with the initial term beginning July 1, 1985. The trustee occupying the “retired teacher” position on the board of trustees on July 1, 1984, and a prior appointment by the Governor shall continue to serve in this position from July 1, 1984, until July 1, 1985; and

The tenth trustee shall be a citizen of Georgia, not a member of the Teachers Retirement System of Georgia, who shall be experienced in the investment of moneys and who shall be elected by the remaining trustees for a term of three years with the initial term beginning July 1, 1984.

If a vacancy occurs in the office of a trustee, the vacancy shall be filled for the unexpired term by the remaining trustees.

The trustees shall each receive the daily expense allowance authorized for members of the General Assembly for each day spent attending meetings of the board of trustees, any committee meetings called pursuant to authorization of the board of trustees, and for time spent in necessary travel. In addition to such per diem, the trustees shall be reimbursed for all actual traveling and other expenses necessarily incurred through service on the board of trustees. State officials serving ex officio shall receive no per diem but shall only be entitled to reimbursement of actual expenses.

Each trustee shall, within ten days after his appointment or election, take an oath of office that so far as it devolves upon him he will diligently and honestly administer the affairs of the board of trustees and that he will not knowingly violate or willingly permit to be violated any laws applicable to the retirement system. Such oath shall be subscribed to by the trustee making it, certified by the officer before whom it is taken, and shall be filed immediately in the office of the Secretary of State.

Six trustees at any meeting of the board of trustees shall constitute a quorum to transact business. Each trustee shall be entitled to one vote. Five votes shall be necessary for a decision by the board of trustees.

With respect to the selection of all trustees under the provisions of subsection (a) of this Code section, the Governor, the board of trustees, the Board of Regents of the University System of Georgia, and the nominating committee provided for by subsection (g) of this Code section shall give due consideration to minority groups included within the teaching profession.

The Teachers Retirement System Nominating Committee is created and such committee shall be composed of five members. Two members shall be from the Georgia Association of Educators, each of whom shall be selected from different geographical areas of the state; one member shall be from the Georgia Federation of Teachers; one member shall be from the Professional Association of Georgia Educators; and one member shall be from the Georgia Association of Educational Leaders. The members of each respective organization shall elect its respective member or members of the nominating committee by May 1, 1984. The members of the nominating committee shall serve for terms of three years and their successors shall be selected in the same manner as the original members. Any vacancy shall be filled for the unexpired term by the members of the educational organization which elected the member wherein the vacancy exists.

The nominating committee shall submit to the Governor a list of three names for each person to be appointed by the Governor pursuant to paragraphs (4), (5), and (6) of subsection (a) of this Code section as a member of the board. In making appointments pursuant to paragraphs (4), (5), and (6) of subsection (a) of this Code section, the Governor may consider the names submitted by the nominating committee, but it is specifically provided that the appointments shall be at the sole discretion of the Governor, and the Governor shall not be required to choose any appointee from names submitted by the nominating committee.

The members of the nominating committee shall serve without compensation. Such members may be reimbursed for travel or other expenses incurred in attending meetings of the nominating committee from the funds of their respective employers or educational organizations but not from the funds of the Teachers Retirement System of Georgia.

History.

Ga. L. 1943, p. 640, § 6; Ga. L. 1964, p. 219, § 1; Ga. L. 1965, p. 112, § 1; Ga. L. 1971, p. 226, § 2; Ga. L. 1971, p. 413, § 1; Ga. L. 1975, p. 495, §§ 1, 2; Ga. L. 1975, p. 1637, §§ 3, 4; Ga. L. 1978, p. 1441, § 1; Ga. L. 1984, p. 1155, §§ 1, 2; Ga. L. 1985, p. 209, § 1; Ga. L. 1987, p. 146, § 1; Ga. L. 1989, p. 52, § 1; Ga. L. 1991, p. 274, § 2; Ga. L. 1993, p. 1402, § 18; Ga. L. 1993, p. 1690, § 3; Ga. L. 2010, p. 863, § 3/SB 296.

The 2010 amendment,

effective July 1, 2010, substituted “state treasurer” for “director of the Office of Treasury and Fiscal Services” in paragraph (a)(3).

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 1984, p. 1155, § 3, not codified by the General Assembly, provides: “For the purpose of the creation of the nominating committee provided for in quoted subsection (g) of Section 2 of this Act [which amended subsection (e) of this Code section and added subsections (f) and (g)], for the purpose of the submission of names to the Governor by said nominating committee, and for the purpose of making appointments to the Board of Trustees of the Teachers Retirement System of Georgia in conformity with the requirements of quoted revised subsection (a) of Section 1 of this Act [which amended subsection (a) of this Code section], this Act shall become effective upon its approval by the Governor or upon its otherwise becoming law. For the purposes of the composition of the Board of Trustees of the Teachers Retirement System of Georgia in conformity with the requirements of quoted revised subsection (a) of Section 1 of this Act, this Act shall become effective on July 1, 1984.”

47-3-22.
Election of chairman and executive director of the board of trustees; payments by executive director of retirement system funds; surety bond required of executive director.

The board of trustees shall elect from its membership a chairman and shall elect an executive director, who shall not be one of its members.

The executive director shall be subject to the rules and regulations of the board of trustees and shall be the treasurer of the assets of the retirement system. All payments of the funds of the retirement system shall be made by the executive director and only upon vouchers signed by him and countersigned by one other person designated by the board of trustees. The executive director shall furnish the board of trustees with a surety bond issued by a company authorized to do business in this state and in such an amount as shall be required by the board of trustees. The premium on such bond shall be paid from the expense fund provided for in Code Section 47-3-47.

History.

Ga. L. 1943, p. 640, §§ 6, 7; Ga. L. 1990, p. 536, § 1.

47-3-23.
Designation and duties of an actuary for the board of trustees; periodic actuarial investigation and recommendations; calculation tables and regular interest rate; annual valuation.

The board of trustees shall designate an actuary who shall be the technical adviser of the board of trustees on matters regarding the operation of the funds created by this chapter and who shall perform such duties as are required in connection therewith.

From time to time, but at least once in every five-year period, the actuary shall make an actuarial investigation into the mortality, service, and compensation experience of the members and beneficiaries of the retirement system and recommend for adoption by the board of trustees, mortality, service, and other tables needed in the operation of the retirement system. Taking into account the results of such investigations, the board of trustees from time to time shall adopt for the retirement system such mortality, service, and other tables as it shall deem necessary for use in all calculations required in connection with this retirement system. The board of trustees shall also determine from time to time the rates of regular interest for use in all calculations required in connection with the retirement system, limited to a minimum of 2 percent.

On the basis of regular interest and the tables last adopted by the board of trustees, the actuary shall make annual valuations of the contingent assets and liabilities of the retirement system.

History.

Ga. L. 1943, p. 640, § 6; Ga. L. 1971, p. 413, § 1; Ga. L. 1975, p. 1637, § 4; Ga. L. 1978, p. 1441, § 1; Ga. L. 1982, p. 3, § 47; Ga. L. 1982, p. 978, §§ 1, 2; Ga. L. 2010, p. 1207, § 65/SB 436.

The 2010 amendment,

effective July 1, 2010, substituted “adviser” for “advisor” in the middle of subsection (a).

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2010, p. 1207, § 1, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “The intent of this Act is to repeal obsolete and inoperative provisions and to make certain stylistic corrections in Title 47 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated. Nothing in this Act shall deny, abridge, increase, renew, revive, or on any way affect any right, benefit, option, credit, or election to which any person was entitled pursuant to such title on June 30, 2010, and the board of trustees of each public retirement system is authorized and directed to provide by regulation for the continuation of any such right, benefit, option, credit, or election not otherwise covered in this Act; provided, however, that any such right, benefit, option, credit, or election shall be subject to the statutory provisions in effect on June 30, 2010.”

47-3-24.
Legal adviser of the board of trustees.

The Attorney General shall be the legal adviser of the board of trustees.

History.

Ga. L. 1943, p. 640, § 6; Ga. L. 2010, p. 1207, § 65/SB 436.

The 2010 amendment,

effective July 1, 2010, substituted “adviser” for “advisor” in this Code section.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2010, p. 1207, § 1, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “The intent of this Act is to repeal obsolete and inoperative provisions and to make certain stylistic corrections in Title 47 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated. Nothing in this Act shall deny, abridge, increase, renew, revive, or on any way affect any right, benefit, option, credit, or election to which any person was entitled pursuant to such title on June 30, 2010, and the board of trustees of each public retirement system is authorized and directed to provide by regulation for the continuation of any such right, benefit, option, credit, or election not otherwise covered in this Act; provided, however, that any such right, benefit, option, credit, or election shall be subject to the statutory provisions in effect on June 30, 2010.”

47-3-25.
Medical board; designation; duties regarding medical examinations required under this chapter.

The board of trustees shall designate a medical board of three physicians who are not eligible to participate in the retirement system. Other physicians may be employed to report on special cases, as necessary. The medical board shall arrange for and pass upon all medical examinations required under this chapter and shall report in writing to the board of trustees its conclusions and recommendations upon all the matters referred to it.

History.

Ga. L. 1943, p. 640, § 6; Ga. L. 1982, p. 3, § 47.

47-3-26.
Powers and duties of the board of trustees generally.

The administration and responsibility for the proper operation of the retirement system and for placing this chapter into effect are vested in the board of trustees, which shall be organized immediately after a majority of the trustees provided for in Code Section 47-3-21 have qualified and taken the oath of office.

Subject to the limitations of this chapter, the board of trustees may from time to time establish rules and regulations for the administration of the funds created by this chapter and for the transaction of its business.

The board of trustees shall engage such actuarial and other services as shall be required to transact the business of the retirement system.

The compensation of all persons engaged by the board of trustees under subsection (c) of this Code section and all other expenses of the board necessary for the operation of the system shall be paid at such rates and in such amounts as the board of trustees shall approve.

The board of trustees shall keep in convenient form such data as shall be necessary for actuarial valuations of the various funds of the retirement system and for checking the experience of the retirement system.

The board of trustees shall keep a record of all of its proceedings, which shall be open to public inspection.

The board of trustees shall publish an annual report showing the fiscal transactions of the retirement system for the preceding year, the amount of the accumulated cash and securities of the retirement system, and the last balance sheet showing the financial condition of the retirement system, by means of an actuarial valuation of the contingent assets and liabilities of the retirement system.

History.

Ga. L. 1943, p. 640, § 6.

47-3-27.
Investment powers; power to maintain cash on deposit for payments under the retirement system; personal interests in investments prohibited.

The members of the board of trustees shall be the trustees of the retirement system and shall have full power to invest and reinvest its assets, subject to all the terms, conditions, limitations, and restrictions imposed by Article 7 of Chapter 20 of this title, the “Public Retirement Systems Investment Authority Law.” Subject to like restrictions, the board of trustees shall have the power to hold, transfer, and dispose of any investments in which retirement system assets are invested, including proceeds of investments. The board of trustees is authorized to employ agents, including banks and trust companies, to act as investment advisers and make investments if the board of trustees so authorizes.

For the purpose of meeting disbursements for pensions, annuities, and other payments, the board of trustees may keep available cash on deposit in one or more banks or trust companies organized under the laws of this state or of the United States, provided that the sum on deposit in any one bank or trust company shall not exceed 25 percent of the paid-up capital and surplus of each bank or trust company. Each bank or trust company shall give a depository bond in an amount sufficient to cover the deposits or shall place in trust a sufficient amount of federal or state securities to cover the deposits.

Except as otherwise provided in this chapter no trustee or employee of the board of trustees shall have any personal interest in the gains or profits from any investment made by the board of trustees or use the assets of the retirement system in any manner, directly or indirectly, for himself or as an agent, except to make such payments as are authorized by the board of trustees in accordance with this chapter.

History.

Ga. L. 1943, p. 640, § 7; Ga. L. 1963, p. 433, § 1; Ga. L. 1969, p. 391, § 2; Ga. L. 1995, p. 651, § 2; Ga. L. 2000, p. 2, § 5; Ga. L. 2010, p. 1207, § 64/SB 436.

The 2010 amendment,

effective July 1, 2010, substituted “paid-up capital” for “paid up capital” in the first sentence of subsection (b).

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2010, p. 1207, § 1, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “The intent of this Act is to repeal obsolete and inoperative provisions and to make certain stylistic corrections in Title 47 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated. Nothing in this Act shall deny, abridge, increase, renew, revive, or on any way affect any right, benefit, option, credit, or election to which any person was entitled pursuant to such title on June 30, 2010, and the board of trustees of each public retirement system is authorized and directed to provide by regulation for the continuation of any such right, benefit, option, credit, or election not otherwise covered in this Act; provided, however, that any such right, benefit, option, credit, or election shall be subject to the statutory provisions in effect on June 30, 2010.”

Ga. L. 2010, p. 1207, § 67, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “In the event of an irreconcilable conflict between a provision of Sections 62 through 64 of this Act and a provision of another Act enacted at the 2010 regular session of the General Assembly, the provision of such other Act shall control over this Act to the extent of the conflict.”

47-3-28.
Rights exempted from levy and sale, garnishment, and other process; assignability; exemptions for other retirement systems; assets and investments and their transfer or sale exempted.

The right to a pension, annuity, retirement allowance, return of contributions, the pension, annuity, or retirement allowance itself, any optional benefit, or any other right accrued or accruing to any person under this chapter and the moneys in the various accounts created by this chapter are exempt from any state, county, or municipal tax, except as provided in Code Section 48-7-27; exempt from levy and sale, garnishment, attachment, or any other process whatsoever; and shall not be assignable except as otherwise specifically provided in this chapter. The exemptions under this Code section shall extend to benefits accrued or accruing to any member of a local retirement system, whether such benefits are attributable to amounts paid by the retirement system to such local retirement system for the account and benefit of the member, or otherwise.

A resident of this state who receives a pension, annuity, or retirement allowance from a teachers’ retirement system of another state or political subdivision shall be entitled to the same exemptions with respect to such benefits as are set forth in subsection (a) of this Code section, provided that the law of such other state or political subdivision allows substantially the same treatment to a person residing there with respect to a pension, annuity, or retirement allowance received from the Teachers Retirement System of Georgia.

The tangible, intangible, real, personal, or mixed property investments or assets of this retirement system of whatever kind or nature and the earnings or proceeds derived from such investments or assets are declared to be public property and exempt from taxation by the state, or by any county, municipality, authority, or political subdivision of this state and exempt from levy and sale, garnishment, attachment, or any other process whatsoever.

The transfer or sale of tangible, real, personal, or mixed property investments or assets to or from this retirement system and the instruments of such transfer or sale shall be exempt from any tax on such sales, transfers, or instruments levied by the state or by any county, authority, municipality, or political subdivision of this state.

History.

Ga. L. 1943, p. 640, § 10; Ga. L. 1968, p. 543, § 2; Ga. L. 1973, p. 896, § 1; Ga. L. 1976, p. 647, § 1; Ga. L. 2000, p. 1449, § 3.

47-3-29.
Deduction of membership dues of nonprofit organizations from benefit payments.

The board of trustees is authorized, but not required, to deduct from benefit payments the membership dues of any nonprofit organization domiciled in Georgia which requests such deductions, provided that at least 30 percent of the retired members of this retirement system belong to such organization and members of the organization request that such deduction be made as provided in subsection (b) of this Code section.

Any retired member desiring the deduction provided for in subsection (a) of this Code section must so notify the board of trustees in writing in the manner specified by the board of trustees. Once begun, any such deduction may be canceled only by a request to the board of trustees in writing in a manner specified by the board of trustees.

Any organization for which membership dues deductions are made as provided in this Code section shall reimburse this retirement system for the actual cost of making such deductions.

Any organization requesting the deductions provided in subsection (a) of this Code section shall reimburse this retirement system for the actual cost of determining if such organization is eligible as provided in subsection (a) of this Code section.

In the event a dispute arises regarding deductions provided in subsection (a) of this Code section, this retirement system shall not be liable to any party in any manner, and the matter shall be settled between the retired member and the organization involved.

History.

Code 1981, §

47-3-29

, enacted by Ga. L. 1993, p. 432, § 1; Ga. L. 1994, p. 92, § 1.